Louisiana, session 2026, SB50.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
bascule bridge that connects to Louisiana Highway 315 in Terrebonne Parish, that is
elevated over the body of water known as Intracoastal Waterway, is hereby designated
as the "Elward T. Brady, Jr. Memorial Bridge".
Section 2.(A) The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs of this designation provided local or
private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual costs
for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of each sign, not to exceed
the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
(B) To the extent that sufficient additional local or private monies are received,
signage provided for by this Act shall also be placed on either side of the bascule bridge
for visibility to crossing watercraft.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.